tests/feature/test-multipos.lexd
PATTERNS
Subject ObjectPrefix VStemBase[tv,cl3]
Subject VStemBase[iv,cl3]

LEXICON Subject
<s_sg1>:ni>

LEXICON ObjectPrefix
<o_sg1>:nech>

PATTERN VStemBase
VerbRootIV [<v><iv>:[iv]]
VerbRootTV [<v><tv>:[tv]]

LEXICON VerbRootIV
blah[cl3]

LEXICON VerbRootTV
ihtoa:{i}htoa[cl3]
